Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4045.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.69, subdivision 5a, is amended to read: Subd. 5a. Managed care contracts. (a) Managed care contracts under this section and section 256L.12 shall be entered into or renewed on a calendar year basis. The commissioner may issue separate contracts with requirements specific to services to medical assistance recipients age 65 and older. (b) A prepaid health plan providing covered health services for eligible persons pursuant to chapters 256B and 256L is responsible for complying with the terms of its contract with the commissioner. Requirements applicable to managed care programs under chapters 256B and 256L established after the effective date of a contract with the commissioner take effect when the contract is next issued or renewed. (c) The commissioner shall withhold five percent of managed care plan payments under this section and county-based purchasing plan payments under section 256B.692 for the prepaid medical assistance program pending completion of performance targets. Each performance target must be quantifiable, objective, measurable, and reasonably attainable, except in the case of a performance target based on a federal or state law or rule. Criteria for assessment of each performance target must be outlined in writing prior to the contract effective date. Clinical or utilization performance targets and their related criteria must consider evidence-based research and reasonable interventions when available or applicable to the populations served, and must be developed with input from external clinical experts and stakeholders, including managed care plans, county-based purchasing plans, and providers. The managed care or county-based purchasing plan must demonstrate, to the commissioner's satisfaction, that the data submitted regarding attainment of the performance target is accurate. The commissioner shall periodically change the administrative measures used as performance targets in order to improve plan performance across a broader range of administrative services. The performance targets must include measurement of plan efforts to contain spending on health care services and administrative activities. The commissioner may adopt plan-specific performance targets that take into account factors affecting only one plan, including characteristics of the plan's enrollee population. The withheld funds must be returned no sooner than July of the following year if performance targets in the contract are achieved. The commissioner may exclude special demonstration projects under subdivision 23. (d) The commissioner shall require that managed care plans: (1) use the assessment and authorization processes, forms, timelines, standards, documentation, and data reporting requirements, protocols, billing processes, and policies consistent with medical assistance fee-for-service or the Department of Human Services contract requirements for all personal care assistance services under section 256B.0659 and community first services and supports under section 256B.85; (2) by January 30 of each year that follows a rate increase for any aspect of services under section 256B.0659 or 256B.85, inform the commissioner and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over rates determined under section 256B.851 of the amount of the rate increase that is paid to each personal care assistance provider agency with which the plan has a contract; and (3) use a six-month timely filing standard and provide an exemption to the timely filing timeliness for the resubmission of claims where there has been a denial, request for more information, or system issue. deleted text begin (e) Effective for services rendered on or after January 1, 2013, through December 31, 2013, The commissioner shall withhold 4.5 percent of managed care plan payments under this section and county-based purchasing plan payments under section 256B.692 for the prepaid medical assistance program. The withheld funds must be returned no sooner than July 1 and no later than July 31 of the following year. The commissioner may exclude special demonstration projects under subdivision 23. deleted text end deleted text begin (f) Effective for services rendered on or after January 1, 2014,deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end The commissioner shall withhold three percent of managed care plan payments under this section and county-based purchasing plan payments under section 256B.692 for the prepaid medical assistance program. The withheld funds must be returned no sooner than July 1 and no later than July 31 of the following year. The commissioner may exclude special demonstration projects under subdivision 23. deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end A managed care plan or a county-based purchasing plan under section 256B.692 may include as admitted assets under section 62D.044 any amount withheld under this section that is reasonably expected to be returned. deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end Contracts between the commissioner and a prepaid health plan are exempt from the set-aside and preference provisions of section 16C.16, subdivisions 6, paragraph (a), and 7. deleted text begin (i)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end The return of the withhold under deleted text begin paragraphsdeleted text end new text begin paragraphnew text end (e) deleted text begin and (f)deleted text end is not subject to the requirements of paragraph (c). deleted text begin (j)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end Managed care plans and county-based purchasing plans shall maintain current and fully executed agreements for all subcontractors, including bargaining groups, for administrative services that are expensed to the state's public health care programs. Subcontractor agreements determined to be material, as defined by the commissioner after taking into account state contracting and relevant statutory requirements, must be in the form of a written instrument or electronic document containing the elements of offer, acceptance, consideration, payment terms, scope, duration of the contract, and how the subcontractor services relate to state public health care programs. Upon request, the commissioner shall have access to all subcontractor documentation under this paragraph. Nothing in this paragraph shall allow release of information that is nonpublic data pursuant to section 13.02. new text begin (j) Effective for services provided on or after January 1, 2026, through December 31, 2026, the commissioner shall withhold two percent of the capitation payment provided to managed care plans under this section and county-based purchasing plans under section 256B.692, for each medical assistance enrollee. The withheld funds must be returned no sooner than July 1 and no later than July 31 of the following year for capitation payments for enrollees for whom the plan submitted to the commissioner a verification of coverage form completed and signed by the enrollee. The verification of coverage form must be developed by the commissioner and made available to managed care and county-based purchasing plans. The form must require the enrollee to provide the enrollee's name and street address and the name of the managed care or county-based purchasing plan selected by or assigned to the enrollee, and must include a signature block that allows the enrollee to attest that the information provided is accurate. A plan must request that all enrollees complete the verification of coverage form, and must submit all completed forms to the commissioner by February 28, 2026. If a completed form for an enrollee is not received by the commissioner by that date: new text end new text begin (1) the commissioner shall not return funds to the plan withheld for that enrollee; new text end new text begin (2) the commissioner shall cease making capitation payments to the plan for that enrollee, effective for the April 2026 coverage month; and new text end new text begin (3) the commissioner shall disenroll the enrollee from medical assistance, subject to any enrollee appeal. new text end